District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-834.06

Certain subordinate interest holder’s right to cure and reinstate note secured by residential lien instrument prior to foreclosure sale auction once in any 12 month period.

Repealed.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-263, § 406, 48 DCR 991
May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 602(a), 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-86, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2991).
Section 2 of Act 14-188, the “Protections from Predatory Lending and Mortgage Foreclosure Improvements Emergency Amendment Act”, deemed approved Nov. 27, 2001, without the signature of the Mayor, provided that D.C. Law 13-263 shall not apply beginning November 6, 2001, through March 6, 2002.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of chapter, see § 403(a) of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).